Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.900

Existing liabilities not affected.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effect of terminating or in any way modifying any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on July 1, 1969.

[ 1969 c 63 s 49.]